Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER 480E

MORTGAGE
RESCUE FRAUD PREVENTION ACT

Section

480E-1 Purpose

480E-2 Definitions

480E-2.5 Mortgage rescue fraud; consumer education

480E-3 Distressed property consultant contract

480E-4 Right to cancel a distressed property
consultant

contract

480E-5 Cancellation of a distressed property
consultant

contract

480E-6 Distressed property conveyance contract

480E-7 Right to cancel a distressed property
conveyance

contract

480E-8 Cancellation of a distressed property
conveyance

contract

480E-9 Distressed property lease

480E-9.5 Recordkeeping and compliance requirements

480E-10 Prohibitions

480E-11 Unfair or deceptive act or practice; penalties

480E-12 Criminal penalties

480E-13 Requirements for attorneys licensed in
Hawaii

480E-14 Enforcement authority

Cross References

Secure and fair enforcement for mortgage licensing act, see
chapter 454F.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next